Nebraska, session 109, LB111.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB111 LB111
2025 2025
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 8 of this act:
(1) Consumer has the same meaning as in section 60-2701;
(2) Consumer care has the same meaning as in section 60-1401.10;
(3) Insurer includes any:
(a) Insurance company; and
(b) Person authorized to represent an insurer with respect to a
claim who is acting within the scope of such person's authority;
(4) Nonoriginal equipment manufacturer means any manufacturer other
than the original equipment manufacturer for the motor vehicle; and
(5)(a) Part means any part that generally constitutes the exterior
of a motor vehicle, including inner and outer panels; and
(b) Part does not include any tire, windshield, or window.
Sec. 2. No insurer shall directly or indirectly require the use of
any nonoriginal equipment manufacturer part that does not carry
sufficient permanent identification so as to identify the manufacturer of
such part. Such identification shall be accessible to the extent possible
after installation.
Sec. 3. No insurer shall directly or indirectly require the use of
any nonoriginal equipment manufacturer part unless such part is at least
equal in quality to the corresponding original equipment manufacturer
part in terms of fit and performance. The cost of any modification that
becomes necessary when making the repair shall be considered as a factor
in determining the quality of the nonoriginal equipment manufacturer
part.
Sec. 4. An insurer shall not directly or indirectly:
(1) Accept any estimate or authorize any repair unless the consumer
is advised that he or she is not required to accept any nonoriginal
equipment manufacturer part in the repair of the motor vehicle and the
consumer consents in writing to the use of any nonoriginal equipment
manufacturer part before any repair is made; or
(2) Require any consumer to pay any difference in price if the
-2-

LB111 LB111
2025 2025
consumer elects to use any original equipment manufacturer part in the
repair of the consumer's motor vehicle.
Sec. 5. (1) Prior to any repair being made on a consumer's vehicle
that involves use of a nonoriginal equipment manufacturer part, the
insurer of the motor vehicle shall provide the following notice to the
consumer in a font that is no smaller print than ten-point type:
THIS ESTIMATE HAS BEEN PREPARED BASED ON THE USE OF AT LEAST ONE
AUTOMOBILE PART NOT MADE BY THE ORIGINAL EQUIPEMENT MANUFACTURER OF YOUR
MOTOR VEHICLE. ANY NONORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER PART USED IN THE
REPAIR OF YOUR MOTOR VEHICLE IS REQUIRED TO BE AT LEAST OF EQUAL QUALITY
IN TERMS OF FIT AND PERFORMANCE TO THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER
PART IT IS REPLACING.
(2) Any nonoriginal equipment manufacturer part that is intended to
be installed on a consumer's motor vehicle shall be clearly identified in
the estimate for the repair of the motor vehicle.
Sec. 6. No insurer shall require consumer care of a motor vehicle
to be completed with aftermarket parts if such motor vehicle was
manufactured within thirty-six months of the date of the damage to the
motor vehicle that is receiving such consumer care.
Sec. 7. An insurer may include the following notice in a policy
that covers consumer care of a motor vehicle manufactured more than
thirty-six months prior to the date of the policy in capitalized ten-
point font and without other policy language on the page:
IN THE REPAIR OF YOUR COVERED MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER THE DAMAGE
COVERAGE PROVISIONS OF THIS POLICY, WE MAY REQUIRE OR SPECIFY THE USE OF
AFTERMARKET PARTS NOT MADE BY THE ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER. SUCH
AFTERMARKET PARTS ARE REQUIRED TO BE AT LEAST EQUAL IN TERMS OF FIT,
QUALITY, PERFORMANCE, AND WARRANTY TO ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER
PARTS.
Sec. 8. Each violation of sections 1 to 7 of this act by any
insurer is a Class I misdemeanor.
-3-